North Dakota, session 69, SB2318.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 50-24.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Family caregiver services.
1. The department shall submit an amendment to all current Medicaid 1915(c) waivers
and those to be developed to provide payment for family caregiver services. The
payment must be made to a legally responsible individual who provides care to an
eligible individual participating in the Medicaid 1915(c) waiver program, excluding the
aged and disabled waiver.
2. When a paid family caregiver service option is available through a Medicaid-approved
home and community-based services waiver, the department shall use an assessmen t
to determine the level of care authorized which must consider the unique needs and
circumstances of all applicants including age, activities of daily living, medical needs,
and social emotional needs. The assessment must be evidence-based,
developmentally accurate, and include a family narrative.
3. A payment under this section to a legally responsible individual must be
commensurate with the current self-directed direct support professional hourly wage. A
legally responsible individual may not be paid for more than 40 hours per week.
4. The cross-disability advisory council shall participate with and advise the department
regarding the planning, design, and ongoing administration of the paid family caregiver
service option on the Medicaid 1915(c) waiver. The council shall provide input into the
Page No. 1 25.0803.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
development of the assessment method used to determine the level of care authorized
for an individual.
Page No. 2 25.0803.02000